District of Columbia statutes.
47-340.21

Deposit of fees and other monies.

Fees authorized under § 47-340.20 and the earnings thereon, capital, and other funds appropriated by Council, and such additional monies that may be contributed from any lawful source shall be deposited in an account to be known as the District of Columbia Great Streets Development Account (“Account”), that shall be a sub-account of the special account established under § 47-131(c)(4).

Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 502(b), 44 DCR 7378
Oct. 19, 2000, D.C. Law 13-172, § 2002, 47 DCR 6308
Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 1102, 48 DCR 6981
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2112(b), 52 DCR 7503
This section is referenced in § 47-340.22.
1981 Ed., § 47-340.21.
D.C. Law 13-172 inserted “, which shall be a sub-account of the special account”.
D.C. Law 14-28 rewrote the section which had read as follows: “Program fees and the earnings thereon authorized under § 47-340.20 shall be deposited in the industrial revenue bond program fee account, which shall be a sub-account of the special account established under § 47-131(c)(4).”
D.C. Law 16-33 rewrote section, which had read as follows: “Program fees and the earnings thereon authorized under § 47-340.20 shall be deposited in the industrial revenue bond special account established under § 47-131(c)(4).”
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1002 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2112(b) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).

Application of Law 12-60: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-340.20.

Industrial Revenue Bond Fees Act of 1997: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-340.20.